NO.8 CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0103f1820600

8

CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START

DESCRIPTION
•  Starter cranks the engine at normal speed but the engine will not run.
•  Refer to the symptom troubleshooting “No.5 Engine stalls” if this symptom appears after engine stalls.
•  Fuel is in the fuel tank.
•  Battery is in normal condition.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Poor fuel quality
•  Intake-air system restriction
•  Fuel line restriction
•  EGR system malfunction
•  Glow system malfunction
•  Fuel pressure sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Suction control valve malfunction (built-in supply pump)
•  Fuel pressure limiter malfunction (built-in common rail)
•  Fuel leakage
•  Fuel filter clogging
•  Incorrect fuel injection timing
•  Erratic signal from CKP sensor
•  Erratic signal from CMP sensor
•  V-reference supply circuit malfunction
•  ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Supply pump malfunction
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Immobilizer system (PATS) and/or circuit malfunction (if equipped)
•  Low engine compression
•  Improper valve timing
•  PCM control repay malfunction
Warning
The following troubleshooting flow chart contains the fuel system diagnosis and repair procedures. Read the following warnings before performing the fuel system services:
•  Fuel vapor is hazardous. It can easily ignite, causing serious injury and damage. Always keep sparks and flames away from fuel.
•  Fuel line spills and leakage are dangerous. Fuel can ignite and cause serious injury or death and damage. Fuel can also irritate skin and eyes. To prevent this, always complete “BEFORE REPAIR PROCEDURE” and “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE” described in this manual.

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Note
•  The following test should be performed for vehicles with an immobilizer system. Go to Step 8 for vehicles without the immobilizer system.
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
•  Engine is not completely started.
•  DTC B1681 is displayed.
Yes
Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 4.
No
Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
2
Is the coil connector securely connected to the coil?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Connect the coil connector securely.
Return to Step 1.
3
Does the security light illuminate?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect instrument cluster and the wiring harness.
4
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve DTC.
DTC
B1213, B1342, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2431
Yes
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
No
Advanced keyless entry system is not equipped:
Go to the next step.
Advanced keyless entry system is equipped:
Go to Step 7.
5
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
•  Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
•  Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to the next step.
6
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
•  Between PCM 95 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
•  Between PCM terminal 87 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to Step 8.
7
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors.
•  Between keyless CM terminal 3Y and coil A
•  Between keyless CM terminal 3AA and coil B
•  Between keyless CM terminal 3W and PCM 87
•  Between keyless CM terminal 3X and PCM 95
Is there any malfunction (open or short circuit, terminal corrosion, etc.)?
Yes
Repair or replace malfunctioning part.
No
Go to the next step.
8
Inspect the following:
•  Fuel quality (e.g.: include water contamination, winter/summer blend)
•  Fuel line/fuel filter clogging
•  Intake-air system restriction
Are all items normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 8.
9
Note
•  Ignore DTC P0122, P0123, P0222 or P0223 while performing this test.
Disconnect the Accelerator pedal position (APP) sensor connector.
Measure the voltage at the APP sensor connector VREF terminal (terminal D and A) and GND with engine switch ON.
Specification
4.5—5.5 V
Is voltage normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect PCM terminal 63 and 82 and the related circuits.
10
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are any DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 119 or 120
•  Open circuit PCM control relay and PCM terminal 105
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 1, 2, 3, 114 or 117)
•  Poor connection to vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
11
Inspect the glow system operation.
Is the glow system operation normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to glow system operation results.
12
Inspect for fuel leakage from the fuel pipe.
Is any fuel leakage found on the fuel pipe?
Yes
Repair or replace if necessary.
No
Go to the next step.
13
Visually inspect the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Are the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace malfunctioning parts.
14
Measure the gap between CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Specification
1.5—2.5 mm {0.059—0.098 in}
Is the gap within specification?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Adjust the CKP sensor position.
15
Visually inspect the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel.
Are the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Inspect the following PIDs:
•  ECT
•  RPM
If the PID value is not as specified, repair or replace the malfunctioning parts.
If the PID value is normal, go to the next step.
No
Replace the malfunctioning parts.
16
Inspect the fuel pressure sensor.
Is the fuel pressure normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the common rail.
17
Inspect the suction control valve.
Is suction control valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the supply pump.
18
Is the engine compression correct?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect the following:
•  Damaged valve seat
•  Worn valve stem and valve guide
•  Worn or stuck piston ring
•  Worn piston, piston ring or cylinder
•  Improper valve timing
Service if necessary.
19
Inspect the fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace if necessary.
20
Inspect the EGR system operation.
Is the EGR system operation normal?
Yes
Remove and inspect the supply pump and the common rail.
No
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to EGR system operation results.
21
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms.
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect the related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, reprogram the PCM if later calibration is available. Retest.